Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1603 Applicability and exemptions.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), any person who seeks to develop a
new residential development within a designated school impact district
requiring:

(1) A county subdivision approval;

(2) A county building permit; or

(3) A condominium property regime approval for the
project,

shall be required to fulfill the land component
impact fee or fee in lieu requirement and construction cost component impact
fee requirement of the department, including all government housing projects and
projects processed pursuant to sections 46-15.1 and 201H-38.

(b) The following shall be exempt from this
section:

(1) Any form of housing permanently excluding
school-aged children, with the necessary covenants or declarations of
restrictions recorded on the property;

(2) Any form of housing that is or will be paying the
transient accommodations tax under chapter 237D;

(3) All nonresidential development; and

(4) Any development with an executed education
contribution agreement or other like document with the department for the
contribution of school sites or payment of fees for school land or school
construction. [L 2007, c 245, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 188, §6; am L 2016, c 237,
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next